North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122A. North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.
§ 122A-1.
Short title.

This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “North Carolina Housing Finance Agency Act.”

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 1; 1973, c. 1296, s. 1.

State Government Reorganization.

The North Carolina Housing Corporation was transferred to the Department of Administration by G.S. 143A-85 (now repealed), enacted by Session Laws 1971, c. 864.

North Carolina Home Protection Pilot Program and Loan Fund.

Session Laws 2004-124, ss. 20A.1(a)-(e) provide: “(a) The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall develop, implement, and administer a pilot program to assist North Carolina workers who have lost jobs as a result of changing economic conditions in North Carolina when the workers are in need of assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure. The Agency shall do all of the following:

“(1) Develop and administer the North Carolina Home Protection Pilot Program and Loan Fund to ensure that workers in the counties selected for the Pilot have assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure.
The Agency shall do all of the following:

“(1) Develop and administer the North Carolina Home Protection Pilot Program and Loan Fund to ensure that workers in the counties selected for the Pilot have assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure. The Program shall include counties selected at the discretion of the Agency on the basis of increased rates of foreclosure, actual foreclosure filings, unemployment, the need of local counseling agencies for increased capacity to serve clients in need of assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure, the availability of funds, and other factors the Agency determines to be relevant.

“(2) Make loans secured by liens on residential real property located in North Carolina to property owners who are eligible for those loans.

“(3) Develop and administer procedures by which property owners at risk of being foreclosed upon may qualify for assistance.

“(4) Designate, approve, and fund nonprofit counseling agencies in counties participating in the Program to be available to assist the Agency in implementing the provisions of this section, and to provide services such as direct mortgagee negotiations on behalf of unemployed workers, and to process loan applications for the Agency.

“(5) Develop and fund enhanced methods by which workers may be notified of foreclosure mitigation services, may easily contact local nonprofit counseling agencies, and may apply for loans from the Agency.

“(6) No later than May 1, 2005, report to the General Assembly on the effectiveness of the Program in accomplishing its purposes, and provide any other information the Agency determines is pertinent or that the General Assembly requests.

“(b)
As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

“(1)
Agency. — The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.

“(2)
Counseling agency. — A nonprofit counseling agency located in North Carolina that is approved by the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.

“(3)
Mortgage. — An obligation evidenced by a security document and secured by a lien upon real property located within North Carolina, including a deed of trust and land sale agreement. Mortgage also means an obligation evidenced by a security lien on real property upon which an owner-occupied mobile home is located.

“(4)
Mortgagee. — The owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, the servicer for the owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, or the trustee for a securitized trust that holds title to a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan.

“(c)
The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall conduct a study and convene meetings of experts for the purpose of developing a report to the 2005 General Assembly.
The report shall include recommendations regarding (i) the problem of increasing foreclosure filings statewide, (ii) improvements to the laws regarding foreclosure procedures and other laws that impact foreclosure filings, and (iii) the benefits and feasibility of creating a foreclosure avoidance loan fund. The Agency may use no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the funds appropriated in this act to the Agency to implement this subsection.
The Agency shall report its recommendations to the General Assembly on or before May 1, 2005.

“(d)
Notwithstanding Chapters 23, 24, and 45 of the General Statutes or any other provision of law, upon the proper filing of an application for loan assistance by a mortgagor under this section, a mortgagee shall not do the following:

“(1) Accelerate the maturity of any mortgage obligation covered under this section.

“(2)
Commence or continue any legal action, including mortgage foreclosure pursuant to Chapter 45 of the General Statutes, to recover the mortgage obligation.

“(3)
Take possession of any security of the mortgagor for the mortgage obligation.

“(4)
Procure or receive a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

“(5)
Enter judgment by confession pursuant to a note accompanying a mortgage.

“(6)
Proceed to enforce the mortgage obligation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure for a period of 120 days following the date of the mortgagor’s properly filed application.

“The provisions of this section shall not apply if the mortgagee receives notice from the Agency that the mortgagor’s application has been denied.

“If a mortgagee acts as proscribed in subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection, a mortgagor shall be entitled to injunctive relief without the necessity of providing a bond. This relief shall be in addition to any defenses available under G.S. 45-21.16(d) and any other remedies at law or equity.

“Upon the Agency’s receipt of a properly filed mortgagor’s application for loan assistance, the Agency shall mail notice of the application to the mortgagor’s mortgagee within five business days of the Agency’s receipt of the application. The Agency shall also mail notice of the acceptance or denial of the mortgagor’s application to the mortgagee within five days of the Agency’s determination. Notice shall be deemed sufficient if sent to the last known address of the mortgagee.

“(e)
Rule Making. — Solely with respect to the adoption of procedures for the pilot program by which property owners at risk of being foreclosed upon may qualify for assistance, the Agency is exempt from the requirements of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Prior to adoption or amendment of procedures, the Agency shall:

“(1)
Publish the proposed procedures in the North Carolina Register at least 30 days prior to the adoption of the final procedures.

“(2)
Accept oral and written comments on the proposed procedures.

“(3)
Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed procedures.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as ‘The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2004’.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 33.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2004-2005 fiscal year, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2004-2005 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 33.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 22.1(a)-(f), provides: “(a) The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency shall continue, develop, implement, and administer a pilot program to assist North Carolina workers who have lost jobs as a result of changing economic conditions in North Carolina when the workers are in need of assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure. The Agency shall do all of the following:

“(1) Develop and administer the North Carolina Home Protection Pilot Program and Loan Fund to ensure that workers in the counties selected for the Pilot have assistance to avoid losing their homes to foreclosure. The Program shall include all counties that had greater than seven percent (7%) average unemployment in the 2004-2005 fiscal year.

“(2) Make loans secured by liens on residential real property located in North Carolina to property owners who are eligible for those loans.

“(3) Develop and administer procedures by which property owners at risk of being foreclosed upon may qualify for assistance.

“(4) Designate, approve, and fund nonprofit counseling agencies in counties participating in the Program to be available to assist the Agency in implementing the provisions of this section, provide services such as direct mortgagee negotiations on behalf of unemployed workers, and process loan applications for the Agency.

“(5) Develop and fund enhanced methods by which workers may be notified of foreclosure mitigation services, may easily contact local nonprofit counseling agencies, and may apply for loans from the Agency.

“(6) No later than April 1, 2008, report to the Chairs of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and the House of Representatives on the effectiveness of the Program in accomplishing its purposes and provide any other information the Agency determines is pertinent or that the General Assembly requests.

“(b) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

“(1) Agency. — The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.

“(2) Counseling agency. — A nonprofit counseling agency located in North Carolina that is approved by the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.

“(3) Mortgage. — An obligation evidenced by a security document and secured by a lien upon real property located within North Carolina, including a deed of trust and land sale agreement. Mortgage also means an obligation evidenced by a security lien on real property upon which an owner-occupied mobile home is located.

“(4) Mortgagee. — The owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, the servicer for the owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, or the trustee for a securitized trust that holds title to a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan.

“(c) Notwithstanding Chapters 23, 24, and 45 of the General Statutes or any other provision of law, upon the proper filing of an application for loan assistance by a mortgagor under this section, a mortgagee shall not do the following:

“(1) Accelerate the maturity of any mortgage obligation covered under this section.

“(2) Commence or continue any legal action, including mortgage foreclosure pursuant to Chapter 45 of the General Statutes, to recover the mortgage obligation.

“(3) Take possession of any security of the mortgagor for the mortgage obligation.

“(4) Procure or receive a deed in lieu of foreclosure.

“(5) Enter judgment by confession pursuant to a note accompanying a mortgage.

“(6) Proceed to enforce the mortgage obligation pursuant to applicable rules of civil procedure for a period of 120 days following the date of the mortgagor’s properly filed application.

“The provisions of this section shall not apply if the mortgagee receives notice from the Agency that the mortgagor’s application has been denied.

“If a mortgagee acts as proscribed in subdivisions (1) through (6) of this subsection, a mortgagor shall be entitled to injunctive relief without the necessity of providing a bond. This relief shall be in addition to any defenses available under G.S. 45-21.16(d) and any other remedies at law or equity.

“Upon the Agency’s receipt of a properly filed mortgagor’s application for loan assistance, the Agency shall mail notice of the application to the mortgagor’s mortgagee within five business days of the Agency’s receipt of the application. The Agency shall also mail notice of the acceptance or denial of the mortgagor’s application to the mortgagee within five days of the Agency’s determination. Notice shall be deemed sufficient if sent to the last known address of the mortgagee.

“(d) Rule Making. — Solely with respect to the adoption of procedures for the pilot program by which property owners at risk of being foreclosed upon may qualify for assistance, the Agency is exempt from the requirements of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Prior to adoption or amendment of procedures, the Agency shall:

“(1) Publish the proposed procedures in the North Carolina Register at least 30 days prior to the adoption of the final procedures.

“(2) Accept oral and written comments on the proposed procedures.

“(3) Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed procedures.

“(e) Funds appropriated under this act to the Agency that are unexpended and unencumbered shall not revert but shall remain available to be used for the expansion of the program to additional counties as provided by this section.

“(f) This section applies only to the 2007-2008 fiscal year.”

Session Laws 2008-34, s. 7, effective June 30, 2008, and expiring July 15, 2008, amended 2007-323, s. 22.1(f) by rewriting it to read: “This section applies to the 2007-2008 fiscal year and to the 2008-2009 fiscal year.” Because the amendment expired on July 15, 2008, the text of Session Laws 2007-323, s. 22.1(f), has been set out in this note as it appeared prior to the 2008 amendment.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2007’.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on taxation and revenue bonds to finance low-income housing, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 830 (1971).

For survey of 1982 law relating to constitutional law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1052 (1983).

§ 122A-2.
Legislative findings and purposes.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that as a result of the spread of slum conditions and blight to formerly sound urban and rural neighborhoods and as a result of actions involving highways, public facilities and urban renewal activities there exists in the State of North Carolina a serious shortage of decent, safe and sanitary residential housing available at low prices or rentals to persons and families of lower income. This shortage is severe in certain urban areas of the State, is especially critical in the rural areas, and is inimical to the health, safety, welfare and prosperity of all residents of the State and to the sound growth of North Carolina communities.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that private enterprise and investment have not been able to produce, without assistance, the needed construction of decent, safe and sanitary residential housing at low prices or rentals which persons and families of lower income can afford, or to achieve the urgently needed rehabilitation of much of the present lower income housing. It is imperative that the supply of residential housing for persons and families of lower income affected by the spread of slum conditions and blight and for persons and families of lower income displaced by public actions or natural disaster be increased; and that private enterprise and investment be encouraged to sponsor, build and rehabilitate residential housing for such persons and families, to help prevent the recurrence of slum conditions and blight and assist in their permanent elimination throughout North Carolina.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that the purposes of this Chapter are to provide financing for residential housing construction, new or rehabilitated, for sale or rental to persons and families of lower income.

The General Assembly hereby finds and declares further that in accomplishing this purpose, the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency, a public agency and an instrumentality of the State, is acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the State in the performance of essential public functions and serves a public purpose in improving and otherwise promoting their health, welfare and prosperity, and that the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency, is empowered to act on behalf of the State of North Carolina and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

The General Assembly hereby further finds and declares that it shall be the policy of said Agency, whenever feasible, to give first priority in its programs to assisting persons and families of lower income in the purchase and rehabilitation of residential housing, and to undertake its programs in the areas where the greatest housing need exists, and to give priority to projects and individual units which conform to sound principles and practices of comprehensive land use and environmental planning, regional development planning and transportation planning as established by units of local government and regional organizations having jurisdiction over the area within which such projects and units are to be located if such government agencies exist in an area under consideration. However, no area of need shall be penalized because government planning agencies do not exist in such areas.

The General Assembly hereby also further finds and declares that private enterprise and investment have not been able to provide, without assistance, the needed installation of energy saving materials in owner occupied residences of persons and families of lower income. It is imperative for the health, safety and welfare of these persons and the general public that their residences be suitably heated at affordable cost in order to provide decent housing; and that the consumption of nonrenewable sources of energy be reduced. Therefore, the General Assembly finds that one of the purposes of this Chapter is to assist persons and families of lower income to obtain loans for the purpose of heating their homes at affordable cost and at the same time to significantly reduce the amount of consumption of nonrenewable sources of energy.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 2; 1973, c. 1296, s. 2; 1977, c. 1083, s. 1.

§ 122A-3.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Agency. — The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency created by this Chapter.

Bonds or notes. — The bonds or the bond anticipation notes or construction loan notes authorized to be issued by the Agency under this Chapter.

Counseling agency. — A nonprofit counseling agency located in North Carolina that is approved by the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.

Energy conservation loan. — A loan obtained from a mortgage lender for the purpose of satisfying an existing obligation of a borrower who is the resident owner of a single-family dwelling or of “residential housing.” The existing obligation of the owner in an “energy conservation loan” must have been incurred to pay for the purchase of materials or the installation of materials, or both, which results in a significant decrease in the amount of consumption of nonrenewable sources of energy in order to provide or maintain a comfortable level of room temperatures in his residence during the winter. “Energy conservation loan” does not include a loan obtained to refinance an existing loan agreement unless payment or collection of the original loan was guaranteed by the Agency.

Federally insured securities. — An evidence of indebtedness secured by a first mortgage lien on residential housing for persons of lower income and insured or guaranteed as to repayment of principal and interest by the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof.

Governmental agency. — Any department, division, public agency, political subdivision, or other public instrumentality of the State, the federal government, any other State or public agency, or any two or more thereof.

Mortgage or mortgage loan. — A mortgage loan for residential housing, including, without limitation, a mortgage loan to finance, either temporarily or permanently, the construction, rehabilitation, improvement, or acquisition and rehabilitation or improvement of residential housing and a mortgage loan insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality thereof or for which there is a commitment by the United States or an instrumentality thereof to insure such a mortgage. A mortgage obligation may be evidenced by a security document and secured by a lien upon real property, including a deed of trust and land sale agreement. Mortgage also means an obligation evidenced by a security lien on real property upon which an owner-occupied mobile home is located.

Mortgage lenders. — Any bank or trust company, savings bank, national banking association, savings and loan association, or building and loan association, life insurance company, mortgage banking company, the federal government, and any other financial institution authorized to transact business in the State.

Mortgagee. — The owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, the servicer for the owner of a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan, or the trustee for a securitized trust that holds title to a beneficial interest in a mortgage loan.

Obligations. — Any bonds or bond anticipation notes authorized to be issued by the Agency under the provisions of this Chapter.

Persons and families of lower income. — Persons and families deemed by the Agency to require such assistance as is made available by this Chapter on account of insufficient personal or family income, taking into consideration, without limitation, (i) the amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs, (ii) the size of the family, (iii) the cost and condition of housing facilities available, (iv) the eligibility of such persons and families for federal housing assistance of any type predicated upon a lower-income basis, and (v) the ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the normal housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is providing decent, safe, and sanitary housing and deemed by the Agency therefore to be eligible to occupy residential housing financed wholly or in part, with mortgages, or with other public or private assistance.

Rehabilitation. — The renovation or improvement of residential housing by the owner of said residential housing.

Residential housing. — A specific work or improvement undertaken primarily to provide dwelling accommodations for persons and families of lower income, including the rehabilitation of buildings and improvements, and such other nonhousing facilities as may be incidental or appurtenant thereto.

State. — The State of North Carolina.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 3; 1973, c. 1296, ss. 3-6, 8-14, 16, 17; 1975, c. 19, s. 42; 1977, c. 1083, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1238, s. 1; 1981, c. 344, s. 1; 1983, c. 148, s. 1; 2008-107, s. 21.1(a); 2012-194, s. 24.

§ 122A-4.
North Carolina Housing Finance Agency.

There is hereby created a body politic and corporate to be known as “North Carolina Housing Finance Agency” which shall be constituted a public agency and an instrumentality of the State for the performance of essential public functions.

The Agency shall be governed by a board of directors composed of 13 members. The directors of the Agency shall be residents of the State and shall not hold other public office.

The General Assembly shall appoint eight directors, four upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives (at least one of whom shall have had experience with a mortgage-servicing institution and one of whom shall be experienced as a licensed real estate broker), and four upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate (at least one of whom shall be experienced with a savings and loan institution and one of whom shall be experienced in home building). Appointments by the General Assembly shall be made in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

, and vacancies in those appointments shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the terms of the four noncategorical appointments by the General Assembly shall expire on June 30, 1983. Subsequent noncategorical appointments shall be for terms of two years each. The terms of the initial categorical appointees by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker shall expire on June 30, 1983; the terms of subsequent appointees shall be two years. The term of one of the initial categorical appointees by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President of the Senate shall expire on June 30, 1983, and the other on June 30, 1985; the terms of subsequent appointees shall be four years.

The Governor shall appoint four of the directors of the Agency; one of such appointees shall be experienced in community planning, one shall be experienced in subsidized housing management, one shall be experienced as a specialist in public housing policy, and one shall be experienced in the manufactured housing industry. The four appointees of the Governor shall be appointed for staggered four-year terms, two being appointed initially for three years and two for four years, and shall continue in office until their successors are duly appointed and qualified. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term.

Any member of the board of directors shall be eligible for reappointment. The 12 members of the board shall then elect a thirteenth member to the board by simple majority vote. Each member of the board of directors may be removed by the Governor for misfeasance, malfeasance or neglect of duty after reasonable notice and a public hearing, unless the same are in writing expressly waived. Each member of the board of directors before entering upon his duties shall take an oath of office to administer the duties of his office faithfully and impartially, and a record of such oath shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

The Governor shall designate from among the members of the Board a chairman and a vice-chairman. The terms of the chairman and vice-chairman shall extend to the earlier of either two years or the date of expiration of their then current terms as members of the Board of Directors of the Agency. The Agency shall exercise all of its prescribed statutory powers independently of any principal State Department except as described in this Chapter. The Executive Director of the Agency shall be appointed by the Board of Directors, subject to approval by the Governor. All staff and employees of the Agency shall be appointed by the Executive Director, subject to approval by the Board of Directors; shall be eligible for participation in the State Employees’ Retirement System; and shall be exempt from the provisions of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. All employees other than the Executive Director shall be compensated in accordance with the salary schedules adopted pursuant to the North Carolina Human Resources Act. The salary of the Executive Director shall be fixed by the Board of Directors. The salary of the Executive Director and all staff and employees of the Agency shall not be subject to any limitations imposed pursuant to any salary schedule adopted pursuant to the terms of the North Carolina Human Resources Act. The Board of Directors shall, subject to the approval of the Governor, elect and prescribe the duties of any other officers it finds necessary or advisable, and the Board of Directors shall fix the compensation of these officers. The books and records of the Agency shall be maintained by the Agency and shall be subject to periodic review and audit by the State.No part of the revenues or assets of the Agency shall inure to the benefit of or be distributable to its members or officers or other private persons. The members of the Agency shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be entitled to receive, from funds of the Agency, for attendance at meetings of the Agency or any committee thereof and for other services for the Agency reimbursement for such actual expenses as may be incurred for travel and subsistence in the performance of official duties and such per diem as is allowed by law for members of other State boards, commissions and committees.The Executive Director shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and business of the Agency, subject to the policies, control and direction of the members of the Agency Board of Directors. The Secretary of the Agency shall keep a record of the proceedings of the Agency and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the Agency, the minute book or journal of the Agency and its official seal. The Secretary may have copies made of all minutes and other records and documents of the Agency and may give certificates under the official seal of the Agency to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the Agency may rely upon such certificates. Seven members of the Board of Directors of the Agency shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting of the Board of Directors duly called and held shall be necessary for any action taken by the Board of Directors of the Agency, except adjournment; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may appoint an executive committee to act in behalf of said Board during the period between regular meetings of said Board, and said committee shall have full power to act upon the vote of a majority of its members. No vacancy in the membership of the Agency shall impair the rights of a quorum to exercise all the rights and to perform all the duties of the Agency.

History.

1969, c. 1235, s. 4; 1973, c. 476, s. 128; c. 1262, ss. 51, 86; c. 1296, ss. 18-20; 1975, c. 19, s. 43; 1977, c. 673, s. 4; c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 895, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1191, s. 32; 1983, c. 148, s. 4; c. 717, ss. 36-37; 1985, c. 479, s. 222; 1987, c. 305, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 26; 1995, c. 490, s. 24; 2004-124, s. 31.15(a); 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

Cross References.

For the North Carolina Human Resources Act, see Chapter 126.

State Government Reorganization.

Session Laws 1981, c. 895, s. 1, provided: The North Carolina Housing Finance Agency is transferred to the Office of State Budget and Management; this transfer shall be neither a Type I nor Type II transfer as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

; the purpose of this transfer is to permit the board of directors of the North Carolina Housing Finance Agency to exercise the powers granted to the agency by Chapter 122A of the General Statutes and all management functions of the agency, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6(c)

, independently of the direction, supervision or control of the Office of State Budget and Management (now the Office of State Budget, Planning, and Management); provided, however, that the agency shall be subject to the management functions of reporting and budgeting, as defined by

G.S. 143A-6

to the extent that the agency shall submit its budgets and reported expenditures to the Office of State Budget and Management (now the Office of State Budget, Planning, and Management) in accordance with the provisions of the Executive Budget Act and shall receive any monies appropriated to the agency by the General Assembly through appropriations to the Office of State Budget and Management (now the Office of State Budget, Planning, and Management) which are designated for use by the agency.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 20.1(a), provides: “Funds appropriated in this act to the Housing Finance Agency for the federal HOME Program shall be used to match federal funds appropriated for the HOME Program. In allocating State funds appropriated to match federal HOME Program funds, the Agency shall give priority to HOME Program projects, as follows:

“(1) First priority to projects that are located in counties designated as Tier One, Tier Two, or Tier Three Enterprise Counties under G.S. 105-129.3; and

“(2) Second priority to projects that benefit persons and families whose incomes are fifty percent (50%) or less of the median family income for the local area, with adjustments for family size, according to the latest figures available from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

“The Housing Finance Agency shall report to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations by April 1 of each year concerning the status of the HOME Program and shall include in the report information on priorities met, types of activities funded, and types of activities not funded.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 20.1(b), provides: “If the United States Congress changes the HOME Program such that matching funds are not required for a given program year, then the Agency shall not spend the matching funds appropriated under this act for that program year.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 20.1(c), provides: “Funds appropriated in this act to match federal HOME Program funds shall not revert to the General Fund on June 30, 2006, or on June 30, 2007.”

For similar provisions, see Session Laws 2001-424, ss. 16.1(a) to (c); and Session Laws 2003-284, ss. 20.1(a) to (c).

Session Laws 1993, c. 321, s. 305(a), effective July 1, 1993, provides: “(a) The statutory authority, powers, duties, and functions, records, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the Housing Coordination and Policy Council, the HOME Program, the Permanent Housing for the Handicapped Homeless Program, and the Comprehensive Housing Affordability Strategy, are transferred from the Division of Community Assistance, Department of Commerce, to the Housing Finance Agency.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2005’.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 46.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2005-2007
fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only
to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 46.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(b), provides: “The following entities and positions created by Chapter 126 of the General Statutes are hereby renamed by this act:

“(1) The State Personnel Commission is renamed the ‘North Carolina Human Resources Commission.’

“(2) The Office of State Personnel is renamed the ‘North Carolina Office of State Human Resources.’

“(3) The State Personnel Director is renamed the ‘Director of the North Carolina Office of State Human Resources.’ ”

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), provides: “Modification of References. — The Revisor of Statutes shall delete any references in the General Statutes to the State Personnel Act, State Personnel Commission, the State Personnel Director, and the Office of State Personnel (or any derivatives thereof) and substitute references to the North Carolina Human Resources Act, the State Human Resources Commission, the Director of the Office of State Human Resources, and the Office of Human Resources (or the appropriate derivative thereof) to effectuate the renaming set forth in this section wherever conforming changes are necessary.”

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.2, provides: “No action or proceeding pending on the effective date of this section, brought by or against the State Personnel Commission, the Director of the Office of State Personnel, or the Office of State Personnel, shall be affected by any provision of this section, but the same may be prosecuted or defended in the new name of the Commission, Director, and Office. In these actions and proceedings, the renamed Commission, Director, or Office shall be substituted as a party upon proper application to the courts or other public bodies.”

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.3, provides: “Any business or other matter undertaken or commanded by the former State Personnel Commission, State Personnel Director, or Office of State Personnel regarding any State program, office, or contract or pertaining to or connected with their respective functions, powers, obligations, and duties that are pending on the date this act becomes effective may be conducted and completed by the Commission, Director, or Office in the same manner and under the same terms and conditions and with the same effect as if conducted and completed by the formerly named commission, director, or office.”

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.4, provides: “This Part [ss. 9.1 to 9.4 of the act] is effective when it becomes law.” The act was approved by the Governor on August 21, 2013.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-124, s. 31.15(a), effective July 1, 2004, in the first paragraph of subsection (f), substituted “Board of Directors” for “General Assembly in the Current Operations Appropriations Act” in the seventh sentence, and in the ninth sentence, substituted “Board of Directors” for “General Assembly” and deleted “in the Current Operations Appropriations” from the end.